Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5859.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), there is levied upon every owner of a new, replacement, or restored facility to which a commercial facilities exemption certificate is issued a specific tax to be known as the commercial facilities tax. (2) The amount of the commercial facilities tax, in each year, for a restored facility shall be is determined by multiplying the total mills levied as ad valorem taxes for that year by all taxing units within which the facility is situated by the taxable value of the real property of the obsolete commercial property for the tax year immediately preceding the effective date of the commercial facilities exemption certificate after deducting the taxable value of the land and of personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under section 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.14. (3) The amount of the commercial facilities tax, in each year, for a new facility or replacement facility shall be is determined by multiplying the taxable value of the facility excluding the land and personal property other than personal property assessed pursuant to under section 14(6) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.14, by the sum of 1/2 of the total mills levied as ad valorem taxes for that year by all taxing units within which the facility is located other than mills levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, plus, subject to section 12a, the number of mills levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906. (4) The commercial facilities tax shall must be collected, disbursed, and assessed in accordance with this act. (5) The commercial facilities tax is an annual tax, payable at the same times, in the same installments, and to the same officer or officers as taxes imposed under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, are payable. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the officer or officers shall disburse the commercial facilities tax payments received each year to and among the this state, cities, townships, villages, school districts, counties, and authorities, at the same times and in the same proportions as required by law for the disbursement of taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), for intermediate school districts receiving state aid under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, of the amount that would otherwise be disbursed to or retained by the intermediate school district, all or a portion, to be determined on the basis of the tax rates being utilized to compute the amount of state school aid, shall must be paid instead to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund. established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. If the sum of any industrial facility taxes prescribed by 1974 PA 198, 207.551 to 207.572, and the commercial facilities taxes paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund that would otherwise be disbursed to the local or intermediate school district, under section 11 of 1974 PA 198, MCL 207.561, and this section, exceeds the amount received by the local or intermediate school district under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, the department of treasury shall allocate to each eligible local or intermediate school district an amount equal to the difference between the sum of the industrial facility taxes and the commercial facilities taxes paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund and the amount the local or intermediate school district received under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681. This subsection does not apply to taxes levied for either of the following: (a) Mills allocated to an intermediate school district for operating purposes as provided for under the property tax limitation act, 1933 PA 62, MCL 211.201 to 211.217a. (b) An intermediate school district that is not receiving state aid under section 56 or 62 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656 and 388.1662. (7) For commercial facilities taxes levied after 1993 for school operating purposes, the amount that would otherwise be disbursed to a local school district shall must be paid instead to the state treasury and credited to the state school aid fund. established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (8) The officer or officers shall send a copy of the amount of disbursement made to each unit under this section to the commission on a form provided by the commission. (9) A new facility, replacement facility, or restored facility located in a renaissance zone under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or a HOPE zone under the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act is exempt from the commercial facilities tax levied under this act to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act, except for that portion of the commercial facilities tax attributable to a special assessment or a tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. The commercial facilities tax calculated under this subsection shall must be disbursed proportionately to the local taxing unit or units that levied the special assessment or the tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. (10) As used in this act, facility does not include a casino. As used in this subsection, "casino" means a casino or a parking lot, hotel, motel, or retail store owned or operated by a casino, an affiliate, or an affiliated company, regulated by this state pursuant to the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (11) As used in this section, "state school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05500'25) or House Bill No. 5856 (request no. H05500'25).